Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-309
Pollutant exclusion; exception for
bodily injury.

An
exclusion in a homeowner's or owner's, landlord's, and tenant's policy of
insurance for loss arising out of the discharge, dispersal, release, or escape
of pollutants shall include an exception to the exclusion for bodily injury
sustained within a building and caused by smoke, fumes, vapor, or soot produced
by or originating from a heating system or ventilation system. This section
applies to policies issued or delivered in this state on or after January
1, 2015.

Laws 2014, LB876, § 1.